Washington statutes.
RCW 6.26.050

Application for prejudgment writ of garnishment—Affidavit.

The plaintiff or someone on the plaintiff's behalf shall apply for a prejudgment writ of garnishment by affidavit, alleging that the garnishment is not sought and the action is not prosecuted to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditor of the defendant and also alleging that the affiant has reason to believe and does believe the following, together with specific facts on which the affiant's belief in the allegations is based: (1) That the defendant is indebted to the plaintiff (specifying the nature of the claim and the amount of such indebtedness over and above all just credits and offsets); (2) that one or more of the grounds for prejudgment garnishment established in RCW 6.26.010 exists; (3) that the plaintiff has reason to believe, and does believe, that the garnishee, stating the garnishee's name and residence or place of business, is indebted to the defendant in amounts exceeding those exempted from garnishment by any state or federal law, or that the garnishee has possession or control of personal property or effects belonging to the defendant which are not exempted from garnishment by any state or federal law; (4) whether or not the garnishee is the employer of the defendant; and (5) if the action is based on a debt not due, that nothing but time is wanting to fix an absolute indebtedness due from the defendant.

[ 1987 c 442 s 905.]